North Carolina, session 2025, SB239.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to assist in increasing the
hourly wages of direct support professionals (DSPs) that serve Medicaid beneficiaries receiving
services under the North Carolina Innovations waiver by five dollars ($5.00) per hour for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and by five dollars ($5.00) per hour for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. To that
end, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall
provide a rate increase for services provided by DSPs to Medicaid beneficiaries receiving
services under the North Carolina Innovations waiver. This rate increase shall be effective on the
date approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services but no sooner than July 1,
2025. Any provider receiving a rate increase under this section shall be required to use at least
ninety percent (90%) of the funding that results from that rate increase to increase the rate of pay
paid to its DSP workforce. This wage increase shall be provided in addition to the rate of pay
each employee was receiving as of June 30, 2025. DHB shall determine the amount of the rate
increase under this section and the definition of DSP to be applied.
*S239-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(b) Upon implementation of the rate increase under subsection (a) of
this section, DHB shall adjust the per member per month (PMPM) capitation amount paid to
local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs). These capitation rate
adjustments shall include amounts sufficient to implement the same rate increase for providers
paid by the LME/MCO and all LME/MCOs shall be required to implement that rate increase.
Providers receiving a rate increase under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this
section.
SECTION 1.(c) Prior to receiving the rate increase under this section, all providers
employing DSPs that serve Medicaid beneficiaries receiving services through the North Carolina
Innovations waiver shall attest and provide verification to DHB, or to the relevant LME/MCO,
that at least ninety percent (90%) of the funding that results from that rate increase is being used
to increase the rate of pay paid to its DSP workforce. DHB shall set the standards for
documentation that shall be required as verification that the provider used the rate increase in the
manner required by this section, and LME/MCOs shall use these same standards at a minimum.
DHB and LME/MCOs may require verifiable methods of accounting, such as payroll-based
journals. Providers receiving a rate increase under this section shall keep documentation of the
use of that rate increase and make the documentation available upon request by DHB or by the
relevant LME/MCO.
SECTION 1.(d) In addition to other allowable reasons for recoupment of funds,
LME/MCOs may recoup part or all of the funds related to the rate increase received by a provider
pursuant to this section if the LME/MCO determines that the provider did not use at least ninety
percent (90%) of the funding that results from that rate increase to increase the rate of pay paid
to its DSP workforce.
SECTION 1.(e) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, LME/MCOs shall report on a
quarterly basis to DHB and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid regarding
provider development efforts and planned or enacted provider rate increases as they pertain to
the DSP workforce.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of one
hundred fifteen million three hundred seventy thousand dollars ($115,370,000) in recurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of two hundred thirty million seven hundred eighty
thousand dollars ($230,780,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to
implement the changes in this act. These funds shall provide a State match for two hundred ten
million seven hundred thirty thousand dollars ($210,730,000) in recurring federal funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of four hundred twenty-one million five hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($421,520,000) in recurring federal funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, and
those federal funds are appropriated to the Division of Health Benefits for the same purpose.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 239-First Edition